Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-512.05
Perpetual care
and maintenance guarantee fund; establish; amount required.

Every cemetery association shall, before selling
or disposing of any interment space or lots, establish a minimum perpetual
care and maintenance guarantee fund of not less than two thousand five hundred
dollars in cash to be administered by the trustee or trustees of the perpetual
care trust fund
selected as provided in section 12-512.03.

Laws 1955, c. 18, § 3, p. 92;

Laws 1967, c. 39, § 1, p. 169;

Laws 2014, LB863, § 8.